Missouri, session 2026, SB1585.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 105.510, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 105.510,
to read as follows:
105.510. 1. Public employees, except police, deputy
sheriffs, Missouri state highway patrolmen, [Missouri] and
employees of the department of the National Guard[, all
teachers of all Missouri schools, colleges and universities,
of any public body] shall have the right to form [and],
join, or terminate membership in a labor [organizations]
organization at any time, and [to] may present proposals to
any public body relative to salaries and other conditions of
employment through the representative of their own
choosing. No such employee shall be discharged or
discriminated against because of his exercise of such right,
nor shall any person or group of persons, directly or
indirectly, by intimidation or coercion, compel or attempt
to compel any such employee to join or refrain from joining
a labor organization, except that the above excepted
employees have the right to form benevolent, social, or
fraternal associations. Membership in such associations may
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1585 2
not be restricted on the basis of race, creed, color,
religion or ancestry.
2. A labor organization or public body may not place a
restriction on the time that a public employee of a school
district may join or terminate membership in a labor
organization.
✓